Utah statutes.
57-10-11.   1983 system to be used after certain dates.

After January 1, 2002, any person, corporation, municipality, county, or state agency who is not utilizing an existing county coordinate system and is establishing a new countywide coordinate network for surveying or mapping, or both, must conform to the Utah Coordinate System of 1983, along with the current federal coordinate update.

